Florida, session 2026, SB2514.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âParagraph (f) of subsection (5) of section 15 1002.411, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 16 1002.411âNew Worlds Scholarship Accounts.â 17 (5)âACCOUNT FUNDING AND PAYMENT.â 18 (f)âA studentâs scholarship account must be closed and any 19 remaining funds shall revert to the state after: 20 1.âDenial or revocation of scholarship eligibility by the 21 commissioner for fraud or abuse, including, but not limited to, 22 the student or studentâs parent accepting any payment, refund, 23 or rebate, in any manner, from a provider of any services 24 received pursuant to subsection (2); or 25 2.âDecember 31, 2026 One consecutive fiscal year in which 26 an account has been inactive. 27 Section 2.âSubsection (20) is added to section 1011.62, 28 Florida Statutes, to read: 29 1011.62âFunds for operation of schools.âIf the annual 30 allocation from the Florida Education Finance Program to each 31 district for operation of schools is not determined in the 32 annual appropriations act or the substantive bill implementing 33 the annual appropriations act, it shall be determined as 34 follows: 35 (20)âDECLINING ENROLLMENT SUPPLEMENT.âIn those districts 36 where there is a decline between prior year and current year 37 unweighted FTE students, the percentage of the decline in the 38 unweighted FTE students, as specified in the General 39 Appropriations Act, shall be multiplied by the current year base 40 amount for the Florida Education Finance Program, as determined 41 in paragraph (1)(n), per unweighted FTE student and shall be 42 added to the allocation for that district. The percentage used 43 for districts that are fiscally constrained must be greater than 44 the percentage used for non-fiscally constrained districts. 45 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.